Wisconsin, session 2025, SB915.
do enact as follows:Law Revision Committee prefatory note: This bill is a remedial legislation proposal, requested by the Department of Workforce Development and introduced by the Law Revision Committee under s. 13.83 (1) (c) 4. and 5., stats. After careful consideration of the various provisions of the bill, the Law Revision Committee has determined that this bill makes minor substantive changes in the statutes, and that these changes are desirable as a matter of public policy.SB915,11Section 1. 47.01 (3m) of the statutes is amended to read:SB915,2,3247.01 (3m) “Personal assistance services” has the meaning given in 29 USC 3706 (11) 705 (28).Note: This Section updates the reference to a current federal definition of “personal assistance services” for the purposes of vocational rehabilitation. SB915,24Section 2. 47.02 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB915,3,4547.02 (1) The state agrees to accept the provisions of 29 USC 701 to 796i 6796L, the rehabilitation act of 1973 as amended, and the provisions of 34 CFR 300 1to 399 to carry out the purposes of the act and to adopt methods of administering 2the vocational rehabilitation program which will maximize federal participation. 3The department shall sign agreements with the federal government under 29 USC 4701 to 796i 796L to provide vocational rehabilitation services.Note: This Section replaces a reference to a federal statute related to vocational rehabilitation with the current federal statutory reference.SB915,35Section 3. 102.28 (3) (a) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB915,3,146102.28 (3) (a) 2. An affidavit by the employee or, if the employee is a minor, by 7the employee and his or her parent or guardian stating that the employee is a 8member of a recognized religious sect and that, as a result of the employee’s 9adherence to the established tenets or teachings of the religious sect, the employee 10is conscientiously opposed to accepting the benefits of any public or private 11insurance that makes payments in the event of death, disability, old age or 12retirement, or that makes payments toward the cost of or provides medical care, 13including any benefits provided under the federal social security act, 42 USC 301 to 141397f 1397mm.Note: This Section updates a citation to the federal social security act.SB915,415Section 4. 103.34 (7) (a) 4. of the statutes is amended to read:SB915,3,2016103.34 (7) (a) 4. Any safety standards prescribed by the federal secretary of 17transportation under 49 USC 13101 to 14915 14916, 49 USC 30101 30172 to 30170 1830183, and 49 USC 31101 31100 to 31504 and any other chapter of title 49 of the 19United States Code that are applicable to the maintenance and operation of a motor 20vehicle that is commonly used to transport traveling sales crew workers.Note: This Section updates citations to federal statutes authorizing the federal secretary of transportation to establish safety standards applicable to the maintenance and operation of vehicles used to transport traveling sales crew workers. SB915,521Section 5. 103.91 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB915,4,51103.91 (2) (a) A migrant labor contractor shall apply to the department for a 2certificate in such manner and on such forms as the department prescribes. The 3migrant labor contractor may submit a copy of a federal application filed under 7 429 USC 2045 1812 in lieu of the forms prescribed by the department under this 5paragraph.Note: This Section updates a citation to a federal statute relating to a certificate of registration for a migrant labor contractor.SB915,66Section 6. 106.11 of the statutes is amended to read:SB915,4,207106.11 Workforce investment programs. The department shall cooperate 8with the federal government in carrying out the purposes of the federal Workforce 9Investment Innovation and Opportunity Act of 1998 2014, 29 USC 2801 to 2945 103101 to 3361. In administering the programs authorized by that act the 11department shall, in cooperation with other state agencies and with local workforce 12development boards established under 29 USC 2832 3122, establish a statewide 13workforce investment system to meet the employment, training, and educational 14needs of persons in this state. If a local workforce development board anticipates 15that there may be a business closing or mass layoff under s. 109.07 in the area 16served by that board, the board may prepare a list of resources available in that 17area that provide career planning, job search, job skills training, and other support 18services for affected employees, as defined in s. 109.07 (1) (a), including contact 19information for those resources, for distribution to those employees under s. 109.07 20(1m) (a).Note: This Section updates the name of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014 (formerly the federal Workforce Investment Act of 1998) and replaces outdated citations to the WIA with citations to the WIOA.SB915,721Section 7. 106.13 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB915,5,41106.13 (2) The council on workforce investment established under 29 USC 22821 3111, the technical college system board, and the department of public 3instruction shall assist the department in providing the youth apprenticeship 4program under sub. (1).SB915,85Section 8. 106.15 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB915,5,76106.15 (1) (a) “Council” means the council on workforce investment 7established under 29 USC 2821 3111.SB915,98Section 9. 106.15 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB915,5,109106.15 (1) (b) “Dislocated worker” has the meaning given in 29 USC 2801 (9) 103102 (15).SB915,1011Section 10. 106.15 (1) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB915,5,1412106.15 (1) (c) “Dislocated worker committee” means the committee or other 13subunit of the council that assists the governor in providing employment and 14training activities to dislocated workers under 29 USC 2862 to 2864 3172 to 3174.SB915,1115Section 11. 106.15 (1) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:SB915,5,1716106.15 (1) (d) “Local plan” means a local plan required under 29 USC 2833 173123 as a condition for a grant.SB915,1218Section 12. 106.15 (7) of the statutes is amended to read:SB915,5,2119106.15 (7) Funding. From the amounts appropriated under s. 20.445 (1) (m), 20all moneys received under 29 USC 2862 to 2864 3172 to 3174 shall be expended to 21fund grants and operations under this section.SB915,1322Section 13. 106.16 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB915,6,423106.16 (2) Any company that receives a loan or grant from a state agency or an 24authority under ch. 231 or 234 shall notify the department and the local workforce 1development board established under 29 USC 2832 3122, of any position in the 2company that is related to the project for which the grant or loan is received to be 3filled in this state within one year after receipt of the loan or grant. The company 4shall provide this notice at least 2 weeks prior to advertising the position.SB915,145Section 14. 106.27 (1m) of the statutes is amended to read:SB915,6,166106.27 (1m) Labor market information system. From the appropriation 7under s. 20.445 (1) (bm), the department shall develop and maintain a labor market 8information system to collect, analyze, and disseminate information on current and 9projected employment opportunities in this state and other appropriate information 10relating to labor market dynamics as determined by the department. The 11department shall make the information contained in the system available, free of 12charge, to school districts, technical colleges, tribal colleges, institutions and college 13campuses within the University of Wisconsin System, local workforce development 14boards established under 29 USC 2832 3122, employers, job seekers, and the 15general public, including making that information available on the department’s 16Internet site.SB915,1517Section 15. 109.07 (1m) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB915,7,718109.07 (1m) (a) Subject to sub. (5) or (6), an employer that has decided upon a 19business closing or mass layoff in this state shall promptly notify the subunit of the 20department that administers s. 106.15, any affected employee, any collective 21bargaining representative of any affected employee, and the highest official of any 22municipality in which the affected employment site is located, in writing of such 23action no later than 60 days prior to the date on which the business closing or mass 24layoff takes place. The notice to an affected employee shall also include contact 1information for the local workforce development board under 29 USC 2832 3122 2serving the area in which the employment site is located and, if available, the list of 3resources prepared under s. 106.11. The employer shall provide in writing all 4information concerning its payroll, affected employees, and the wages and other 5remuneration owed to those employees as the department may require. The 6department may in addition require the employer to submit a plan setting forth the 7manner in which final payment in full shall be made to affected employees.Note: Sections 7 through 15 update citations to the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014.SB915,7,88